District of Columbia statutes.
26-323

Penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any order of the Superintendent [Commissioner] directed to that person, shall be liable for a penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.

(b)

Any person who cashes any check in the District of Columbia without a license issued pursuant to this chapter shall, in addition to the penalty prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, be liable to the District government in an amount equal to all license fees that would have been paid had the person obtained such a license.

(c)

The Corporation Counsel may bring proceedings to recover all amounts due to the District under this section.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 24, 45 DCR 1792
1981 Ed., § 26-1123.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).